District of Columbia statutes.
8-437

Pesticide applicator reports.

Pesticide applicators shall submit to the Department records of pesticide applications to property in the District on an annual basis in a form that the Department shall prescribe; provided, that applications of minimum-risk and reduced-risk pesticides are exempt from this requirement.

Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-191, § 8, 59 DCR 10166

History

Section 14(a) of D.C. Law provided that §§ 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, and 13 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.

Editor's Notes